Utah statutes.
58-44a-302.   Qualifications for licensure.

(1)  An applicant for licensure as a nurse midwife shall:

(a)  submit an application in a form as prescribed by the division;

(b)  pay a fee as determined by the department under Section 63J-1-504;

(c)  be of good moral character;

(d)  at the time of application for licensure hold a license in good standing as a registered nurse in Utah, or be at that time qualified for a license as a registered nurse under Title 58, Chapter 31b, Nurse Practice Act;

(e)  have completed:

(i)  a certified nurse midwifery education program accredited by the American College of Nurse Midwives and approved by the division; or

(ii)  a nurse midwifery education program located outside of the United States which is approved by the division and is equivalent to a program accredited by the American College of Nurse Midwives, as demonstrated by a graduate's being accepted to sit for the national certifying examination administered by the American College of Nurse Midwives or its designee; and

(f)  have passed examinations established by the division rule in collaboration with the board within two years after completion of the approved education program required under Subsection (1)(e).

(2)  For purposes of Subsection (1)(e), as of January 1, 2010, the accredited education program or it's equivalent must grant a graduate degree, including post-master's certificate, in nurse midwifery.

